California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) The rate for existing programs receiving a provisional or permanent rate as specified in paragraph (2) and paragraph (3) shall be increased for all programs eligible for the increase. Eligible programs shall include only those programs which received a deficiency adjustment in their permanent or provisional rate for fiscal year 1989–90, based on calendar year 1988 program and cost information submitted to the department, pursuant to the stipulated order in the case of California Association of Rehabilitation Facilities et al. v. State of California, Sacramento County Superior Court Case No. 355326, and the adjustment was insufficient to fund the entire deficiency. The amount of funds available for the increase is limited to the one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated for that purpose for fiscal year 1990–91, and it shall be distributed proportionately among all eligible programs. The amount of increase which each eligible program shall receive toward its remaining deficiency, based on calendar year 1988 program and cost information, shall be equal to the percentage that one million dollars ($1,000,000) represents of the total deficiency, based on calendar year 1988 program and cost information, for all eligible programs.

(b) A process for establishing rates during fiscal year 1991–92 for new programs and existing programs receiving a temporary, provisional, or permanent rate.

(1) The rate for existing programs receiving a permanent rate, shall be determined based on fiscal year 1989–90 program, cost, and other information submitted to the department and regional center. The ratesetting process shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A process for determination of a mean rate and an allowable range of rates for the same type of day program and staff-to-client ratio. The mean rate shall be determined using those programs’ allowable costs and client attendance and the allowable range of rates shall be defined as the rates of those programs included between the 10th and 90th percentiles.

(B) The rates for existing programs receiving a permanent rate shall be increased or decreased to their allowable costs for fiscal year 1991–92, as follows: 

(i) The rate shall be decreased if the program’s allowable costs and client attendance, for fiscal year 1989–90, determined pursuant to the regulations, would result in a rate that is lower than its existing permanent rate.

(ii) The rate shall be increased if the program’s allowable costs and client attendance for fiscal year 1989–90, determined pursuant to the regulations, would result in a rate that is higher than its existing permanent rate and its existing permanent rate is below or within the allowable range of rates.

(iii) No rate increase shall be provided that would result in the rate exceeding the allowable range of rates. No increase shall be provided for programs whose existing permanent rate is above the allowable range of rates. The amount of funds appropriated for that purpose for fiscal year 1991–92 shall be distributed only to those programs eligible for the increase.

(C) A process for the reduction or increase in the rate of any program whose existing permanent rate is not within the allowable range of rates. This process shall be based upon all of the following:

(i) For programs whose existing permanent rates are above the allowable range of rates, their existing permanent rate shall be reduced by 5 percent or to the allowable range, whichever is less.

(ii) For programs whose existing permanent rates are below the allowable range of rates, after the increase specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) their rate shall be increased, up to the allowable range, in proportion to the amount of funds obtained from reducing the rate of programs whose rates are above the range.

(2) The rate for new programs shall be the mean rate determined pursuant to the process in paragraph (1) for the same type of day program and staff-to-client ratio using the program, cost, and other information submitted by providers receiving a permanent rate.

(3) The rate for existing programs receiving a provisional rate, whose rate expired during fiscal year 1990–91 and was extended until September 1, 1991, shall be determined pursuant to the process specified in paragraph (1) for permanent rates, except that the determination shall be based upon 12 consecutive months of representative costs incurred by the program during the period it was receiving its provisional rate. The program shall submit these costs and other program information, designated by the department, to the department within the time frames specified in the regulations. If the program has not incurred or cannot provide 12 consecutive months of representative costs, the department may determine the rate based on less than 12 consecutive months of representative costs.

(4) The rate for existing programs receiving a provisional rate, whose rate will expire in July or August of 1991, shall be extended until September 1, 1991, and then determined pursuant to the process specified in paragraph (3).

(c) A process for establishing rates during fiscal year 1992–93 for new programs and existing programs receiving a temporary or permanent rate:

(1) The rate for new programs shall be the mean rate, determined pursuant to the process in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) for fiscal year 1991–92, for the same type of day program and staff-to-client ratio.

(2) The rate for existing programs receiving a temporary rate shall be continued at the rate established for fiscal year 1991–92, until the rate expires or a permanent rate is established pursuant to the process in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) for fiscal year 1991–92.

(3) The rate for existing programs receiving a permanent rate shall be reestablished at the rate established for fiscal year 1991–92, except for programs whose rates are not within the allowable range of rates. For those programs whose rates are not within the allowable range, their rates shall be reduced or increased pursuant to the process in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for fiscal year 1991–92.

(d) A process for establishing rates during fiscal year 1993–94 for new programs and existing programs receiving a temporary or permanent rate:

(1) The rate for existing programs receiving a permanent rate shall be determined based on fiscal year 1991–92 program, cost, and other information submitted to the department and regional center. The ratesetting process shall include the process specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for fiscal year 1991–92, except that the allowable range of rates shall be determined by computing 50 percent of the mean rate for fiscal year 1993–94 and converting that amount into a range of rates, distributed equally above and below the mean. This process shall compare the range of rates computed for fiscal year 1993–94 with the range of rates calculated for fiscal year 1991–92 based on 80 percent of the programs, and shall use the lesser of the two ranges in the comparison as the allowable range of rates. Once established, this range shall be permanent.

(2) The rate for new programs shall be the mean rate determined pursuant to the process in paragraph (1) for the same type of day program and staff-to-client ratio using the program, cost, and other information submitted by providers receiving a permanent rate.

(3) The rate for existing programs receiving a temporary rate shall be continued at the established rate until the program has incurred 12 consecutive months of representative costs within the timeframes specified in the regulations. Once the representative costs have been incurred, the rate shall be determined pursuant to the process specified in paragraph (1) for permanent rates.

(e) A process for establishing rates, during fiscal year 1994–95 and each alternative fiscal year thereafter, for new programs and existing programs receiving a temporary or permanent rate. The process shall be the same as that specified in subdivision (c) for determining, continuing, and reestablishing rates, but shall be based on the program, cost, and other information submitted to the department and regional center for establishment of rates for fiscal year 1993–94 and each alternative fiscal year thereafter, except for the following:

(1) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, the rates for existing community-based day programs receiving a permanent rate shall be increased if the program’s allowable costs and client attendance, for the 1995–96 fiscal year, determined pursuant to the regulations, would result in a rate that is higher than its existing permanent rate and its existing permanent rate is below or within the allowable range of rates. The rate shall not be decreased if the program’s allowable costs and client attendance for the 1995–96 fiscal year, determined pursuant to the regulations, would result in a rate that is lower than its existing permanent rate.

(2) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, existing community-based day programs receiving a permanent rate, and whose permanent rate is still below the lower limit of the allowable range of rates for like programs after receiving an increase pursuant to paragraph (1), shall receive an increase in their permanent rate up to the lower limit of the allowable range of rates.

(3) The requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 4691, which specify that any rate increases shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, shall also apply to rates governed by paragraphs (1) and (2).

(f) A process for establishing rates, during fiscal year 1995–96 and each alternative fiscal year thereafter, for new programs and existing programs receiving a temporary or permanent rate. The process shall be the same as that specified in subdivision (d) except for the following:

(1) The rate for programs receiving a permanent rate shall be based on program, cost, and other information submitted to the department and regional center for fiscal year 1993–94 and each alternative fiscal year thereafter.

(2) The allowable range of rates, permanently established during fiscal year 1993–94, shall be applied to the mean rate determined for fiscal year 1995–96 and each alternative fiscal year thereafter.

(3) Existing programs receiving a permanent rate whose rates are not within the allowable range of rates shall, by September 1, 1995, have their rates reduced or increased as follows:

(A) For programs whose existing permanent rates are above the allowable range of rates, their rate shall be reduced to the allowable range.

(B) For programs whose existing rates are below the allowable range of rates, their rate shall be increased up to the allowable range in proportion to the amount of funds obtained from reducing the rate of programs whose rates are above the range.

(g) A process for establishing a uniform supplemental rate of reimbursement for programs serving nonambulatory clients, as determined by the department.

(h) A process for notifying the program of the established rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 44.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2006, the community-based day program, work activity program, and in-home respite service agency rate schedules authorized by the department and in operation June 30, 2006, shall be increased by 3 percent, subject to funds specifically appropriated for this increase in the Budget Act of 2006. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers. Any subsequent increase shall be governed by subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (l), and Section 4691.9.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the department shall not establish any permanent payment rate for a
 community-based day program or in-home respite service agency provider that has a temporary payment rate in effect on June 30, 2008, if the permanent payment rate would be greater than the temporary payment rate in effect on or after June 30, 2008, unless the regional center demonstrates to the department that the permanent payment rate is necessary to protect the consumers’ health or safety.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, neither the department nor any regional center shall approve any program design modification or revendorization for a community-based day program or in-home respite service agency provider that would result in an increase in the rate to be paid to the vendor from the rate that is in effect on or after June 30, 2008, unless the regional center demonstrates that the program design modification or revendorization is necessary to protect the consumers’ health or safety and the department has granted prior
 written authorization.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the department shall not approve an anticipated rate adjustment for a community-based day program or in-home respite service agency provider that would result in an increase in the rate to be paid to the vendor from the rate that is in effect on or after June 30, 2008, unless the regional center demonstrates that the anticipated rate adjustment is necessary to protect the consumers’ health or safety.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, except as set forth in subdivisions (f) and (i), the department shall not approve any rate adjustment for a work activity program that would result in an increase in the rate to be paid to the vendor from the rate that is in effect on or after June 30, 2008, unless the regional center demonstrates that the rate adjustment is necessary to protect the consumers’
 health and safety and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing January 1, 2017, the department may approve rate adjustments for a work activity program that demonstrates to the department that the rate adjustment is necessary in order to pay employees who, prior to January 1, 2017, were being compensated at a wage that is less than the minimum wage established on and after January 1, 2017, by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, as amended by Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2016. The rate adjustment pursuant to this subdivision shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to adjust employee pay only to the extent necessary to bring pay into compliance with the increased state minimum wage, and shall not constitute a general wage enhancement for employees paid above the increased minimum wage.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing January 1, 2017, community-based day program and in-home respite services agency providers with temporary payment rates set by the department may seek unanticipated rate adjustments from the department due to the impacts of the increased minimum wage as established by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, as amended by Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2016. The rate adjustment shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to adjust employee pay only to the extent necessary to bring pay into compliance with the increased state minimum wage, and shall not constitute a general wage enhancement for employees paid above the increased minimum wage.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing January 1, 2015, the in-home respite service agency rate schedule authorized by the department and in operation December 31, 2014, shall be increased by
 5.82 percent, subject to funds specifically appropriated for this increase for costs due to changes in federal regulations implementing the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.). The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all applicable providers.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2015, the department may approve rate adjustments for a work activity program that demonstrates to the department that the rate adjustment is necessary to implement Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, as added by Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2014. The rate adjustment may be applied only if a minimum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave per year was not a benefit provided to employees as of June 30, 2015, and shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to
 compensate an employee up to a maximum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave in each year of employment.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2015, community-based day program and in-home respite services agency providers with temporary payment rates set by the department may seek unanticipated rate adjustments from the department if the adjustment is necessary to implement Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, as added by Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2014. The rate adjustment may be applied only if a minimum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave per year was not a benefit provided to employees as of June 30, 2015, and shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to compensate an employee up to a maximum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave in each year of employment.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the in-home respite service agency rate schedule authorized by the department and in operation June 30, 2016, shall be increased by 5 percent. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(l) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the independent living service rate schedule authorized by the department and in operation June 30, 2016, shall be increased by 5 percent. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 26, Sec. 14.   (AB 1606)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department may provide a rate increase for the purpose of enhancing wages for direct care staff in day programs and in work activity programs, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 4851, and in look-alike programs, that meet any of the following criteria:

(1) Provide a majority of their services and supports in integrated community settings.

(2) Are day programs that are converting to integrated community settings.

(3) Are work activity programs that are converting to supported work programs.

(b) The department may approve a temporary rate increase for a program that is converting pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a). A program shall not be eligible for a permanent rate increase pursuant to this section unless it meets the criteria established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) A rate increase provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to existing programs shall be effective not more than 60 days following the adoption of the Budget Act that appropriates the necessary funding.

(d) Prior to implementation of this section, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including various provider organizations, the regional centers, and all other interested parties.

(e) The department shall provide the Legislature, by April 1, 2007, with a description of how this section has been implemented, along with the following information:

(1) The number of day programs and work activity centers receiving an enhanced rate, by regional center.

(2) The number of program conversions, by regional center.

(3) The percentage of rate increase provided to programs.

(4) The effect of the rate increase on direct care staff wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 55.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2008:

(1) A regional center shall not pay an existing service provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, a rate higher than the rate in effect on June 30, 2008, unless the increase is required by a contract between the regional center and the vendor that is in effect on June 30, 2008, or the regional center demonstrates that the approval is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(2) A regional center shall not negotiate a rate with a new service
 provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, that is higher than the regional center’s median rate for the same service code and unit of service, or the statewide median rate for the same service code and unit of service, whichever is lower. The unit of service designation shall conform with an existing regional center designation or, if none exists, a designation used to calculate the statewide median rate for the same service. The regional center shall annually certify to the State Department of Developmental Services its median rate for each negotiated rate service code, by designated unit of service. This certification shall be subject to verification through the department’s biennial fiscal audit of the regional center.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing January 1, 2017, regional centers may negotiate a rate adjustment with providers regarding rates if
 the adjustment is necessary in order to pay employees no less than the minimum wage as established by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, as amended by Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2016, and only for the purpose of adjusting payroll costs associated with the minimum wage increase. The rate adjustment shall be specific to the unit of service designation that is affected by the increased minimum wage, shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to adjust employee pay only to the extent necessary to bring pay into compliance with the increased state minimum wage, and shall not be used as a general wage enhancement for employees paid above the increased minimum wage. Regional centers shall maintain documentation on the process to determine, and the rationale for granting, any rate adjustment associated with the minimum wage increase.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing January 1, 2015, rates for
 personal assistance and supported living services in effect on December 31, 2014, shall be increased by 5.82 percent, subject to funds specifically appropriated for this increase for costs due to changes in federal regulations implementing the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.). The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all applicable providers. As used in this subdivision, both of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Personal assistance” is limited only to those services provided by vendors classified by the regional center as personal assistance providers, pursuant to the miscellaneous services provisions contained in Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Supported living services” are limited only to those services defined as supported living services in Title 17 of the
 California Code of Regulations.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing July 1, 2015, regional centers may negotiate a rate adjustment with existing service providers for services for which rates are determined through negotiation between the regional center and the provider, if the adjustment is necessary to implement Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, as added by Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2014. The rate adjustment may be applied only if a minimum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave per year was not a benefit provided to employees as of June 30, 2015, and shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to compensate an employee up to a maximum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave in each year of employment.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation,
 commencing July 1, 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, rates for transportation services in effect on June 30, 2016, shall be increased by 5 percent. The increase shall be applied as a percentage to existing rates, and the percentage shall be the same for all applicable providers.

(f) This section shall not apply to those services for which rates are determined by the State Department of Health Care Services, or the State Department of Developmental Services, or are usual and customary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 26, Sec. 15.   (AB 1606)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.10.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department shall provide a rate increase for the purpose of enhancing wages and benefits for staff who spend a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers. The department shall not allocate more than one hundred sixty-nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($169,500,000) of the amount appropriated in the act that added this section for this purpose, plus any associated matching funds. The rate increase shall only apply to services for which rates are set by the department or through negotiations between the regional centers and service providers, and to the rates paid for supported employment services, as specified in subdivisions (a)
 and (b) of Section 4860, and vouchered community-based services, as specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 4688.21. This section shall not apply to those services for which rates are determined by other entities, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Health Care Services or the State Department of Social Services, or are usual and customary.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “direct services” are services, supports, care, supervision, or assistance provided by staff directly to a consumer to address the consumer’s needs, as identified in the individual program plan, and include staff’s participation in training and other activities directly related to providing services to consumers, as well as program preparation functions as defined in Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. State employees participating in the Community State Staff Program are ineligible for the wage
 increase described in this section.

(b) The rate increase specified in subdivision (a) shall be implemented in the following manner:

(1) With regional center participation, the department shall conduct a survey of a random sample of service providers in each service category eligible for the rate increase. The survey shall request information regarding all of the following and shall be returned to the regional center and department by April 15, 2016:

(A) Number of employees who spend a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers and their total salary, wage, and benefit costs.

(B) Administrative costs as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4629.7, including the number of employees and total salary, wage, and benefit
 costs associated with those administrative costs.

(C) Any other staff and their total salary, wage, and benefit costs that are not included in either subparagraph (A) or (B).

(D) Any other costs to the provider, other than the costs described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive.

(E) Any additional information, as requested by the department, to assist in the determination of rate increases.

(2) The vendoring regional center shall certify that, to the best of its knowledge, the survey results accurately reflect the services provided by each surveyed service provider. The results from the survey shall be used by the department to determine the rate increase to be applied, by service category. The rate increase shall be the same for all eligible
 providers in each service category and is intended to provide comparable increases across service categories for staff providing direct services as described in subdivision (a).

(3) By July 1, 2016, utilizing the data derived from paragraph (1), the department shall do both of the following:

(A) For those service providers whose rates are set by the department, notify those providers and the associated regional centers of the amount by which the rates are to be increased.

(B) For those service providers whose rates are set by negotiation with the regional center, notify the regional center of the amount by which the rates are to be increased.

(4) With regional center participation, the department shall conduct a survey, in a format determined by the
 department, of all providers who received the rate increase described in subdivision (a). Providers shall submit the completed survey to the department by October 1, 2017. The survey shall request information on how the rate increase was used by providers and shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Number of employees and their salary, wage, and benefit costs, and increases provided as a result of this subdivision.

(B) Percentage of time each employee spends providing direct services.

(C) Administrative expenses, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 4629.7.

(D) Any additional information as determined by the department.

(c) Providers granted a rate increase pursuant
 to this section shall maintain documentation, subject to audit by the department or regional center, that the rate increase was used solely to increase wages, salaries, and benefits of eligible staff members spending a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers.

(d) The rate increases calculated by the department pursuant to this section shall be effective July 1, 2016, and implemented as described in subdivision (b).

(e) Any provider that fails to report the information required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) to the department by October 1, 2017, shall forfeit the increases described in subdivision (a).

(f) In its 2017–18 May Revision fiscal estimate, the department shall describe the implementation of the increases provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 9.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.11.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department shall allocate no more than nine million nine hundred thousand dollars ($9,900,000) plus any associated matching funds for the purpose of administrative expenses for service providers. The department shall provide a rate increase for the purpose of administrative expenses that shall apply only to providers for which rates are set by the department or through negotiations between the regional centers and service providers, and to the rates paid for supported employment services, as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4860, and vouchered community-based services, as specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 4688.21. This increase shall be determined using the
 information collected pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4691.10. This increase shall be consistent for providers within each service category and is intended to provide comparable increases for administrative expenses across service categories. This section shall not apply to those services for which rates are determined by other entities, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Health Care Services or the State Department of Social Services, or are usual and customary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 10.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.12.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, and contingent upon the approval of federal funding, the department shall provide a rate increase effective January 1, 2020, for all of the following services:

(A) Specified services for which rates are set by the department or through negotiations between the regional centers and service providers.

(B) Rates paid for supported employment services, as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4860.

(C) Vouchered community-based services, as specified in paragraph (7) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 4688.21.

(2) The rate increase shall be applied to rates in effect on December 31, 2019, less the amount of any one-time rate increases for developmental services, as authorized in the Budget Act of 2018 (Chapter 29 of the Statutes of 2018). The rate increase shall be applied as a percentage, and this percentage shall be the same for all providers within each service category, as established by the department and set forth in the supplemental rate increase schedule posted on the department’s internet website.

(3) The rate increase provided in this subdivision shall not apply to those services for which rates are determined by other entities, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Health Care Services or the State Department of Social Services, or are usual and customary.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, and contingent upon the approval of federal funding, the department shall provide a rate increase effective January 1, 2021, for all of the following services:

(A) Independent living programs that use the service code identified in paragraph (35) of subdivision (a) of Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Infant development programs that use the service code identified in paragraph (37) of subdivision (a) of Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) Early start specialized therapeutic services provided by vendors classified by a regional center as early start specialized therapeutic services
 providers pursuant to Section 54356 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The rate increase shall be applied to rates in effect on December 31, 2020. The rate increase shall be applied as a percentage, and this percentage shall be the same for all providers within each service category, as established by the department and set forth in the rate increase schedule posted on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 50.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Note: If and when this section ceases to be implemented (pursuant to subd. (b)), see Section 4692.)
-------------------------------------------

4693.

For the purposes of this article, “infant day program” means a day training and activity program where infants and their families are provided training individually and in groups for a day or less, and are provided an organized program of activity. These programs are designed to encourage the development and adjustment of the infants in the community and their homes, and to prepare the infants for entrance into classes of local schools or other appropriate facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 168, Sec. 3.   Effective April 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4694.

Commencing July 1, 2006, all regional center vendors who are qualified providers under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and are serving individuals enrolled under the Home- and Community-based Services Waiver program for persons with developmental disabilities, shall ensure that billing information provided to regional centers identifies each individual consumer and, for each consumer, the specific dates of service, location of service, service unit, unit costs, and other information necessary to support billing under the home- and community-based services waiver. Regional centers shall also ensure that their contractual and other billing and payment arrangements with providers require the provision of any information necessary to support billing under the Home- and Community-based Services Waiver program. Resources provided to regional centers, pursuant to the Budget Act of 2006 and following budgets, to implement this provision shall be allocated to the regional centers only until implementation of a statewide electronic data system that collects the billing information necessary to support billing under the Home- and Community-based Services Waiver program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 56.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Residential Facility Staff Training [4695. - 4695.2.]

4695.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall offer, through the regional centers, in conjunction with community colleges which elect to participate, a uniform statewide training program for directors or licensees of residential facilities serving persons with developmental disabilities. The training program shall be at the college level, and shall be given for college credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4695.2.

(a) Each direct care staff person employed in a licensed community care facility that receives regional center funding shall be required to satisfactorily complete two 35-hour competency-based training courses approved, after consultation with the Community Care Facility Direct Care Training Work Group, by the department or pass a department-approved competency test for each of the 35-hour training segments. Each direct care staff person to whom this subdivision applies shall demonstrate satisfactory completion of the competency-based training by passing a competency test applicable to that training segment.

(b) Each direct care staff person employed prior to January 1, 2001, in a
 licensed community care facility that receives regional center funding shall satisfactorily complete the first required competency-based training course or pass a department-approved competency test applicable to that training segment by January 1, 2002, and satisfactorily complete the second competency-based training course or pass a department-approved competency test applicable to that training segment by January 1, 2003.

(c) Each direct care staff person whose employment in a licensed community care facility that receives regional center funding commences on or after January 1, 2001, shall satisfactorily complete the first required competency-based training course or pass a department-approved competency test applicable to that training segment within one year from the date the staff person was hired, and satisfactorily complete the second competency-based training course or pass a department-approved competency test applicable to that
 training segment within two years from the date the person was hired.
